Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4226
Major medical expense coverage required;
considerations.

(1) The pool shall offer major medical expense
coverage to every eligible individual. The pool coverage, its schedule of
benefits, and exclusions and other limitations shall be established through
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director taking into
consideration the advice and recommendations of the members.

(2) In establishing the pool coverage, the director shall take into
consideration the levels of individual health insurance coverage provided
in the state and such medical economic factors as may be deemed appropriate
and shall determine benefit levels, deductibles, coinsurance and stop-loss
factors, exclusions, and limitations determined to be generally reflective
of and commensurate with individual health insurance coverage provided by
the ten insurers writing the largest
amount of individual health insurance coverage in the state.

(3) Pool coverage established under this section shall provide both
an appropriate high and low deductible to be selected by the pool applicant.
The deductibles and coinsurance and stop-loss factors may be adjusted annually
according to the medical component of the Consumer Price Index.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 26;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 39;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 28;

Laws 2009, LB358, § 7.